Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 7 Office of Trustee
35-15-713. Vacancy; directed trusts.

Except as otherwise provided by the terms of the trust upon obtaining knowledge of a vacancy in the office of trust advisor or trust protector, the trustee shall be vested with any fiduciary power or duty that otherwise would be vested in the trustee but that by the terms of the trust was vested in the trust advisor or trust protector, until such time that the vacancy in the office of trust advisor or trust protector, as applicable is filled.

Such vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as would a vacancy in trusteeship that is required to be filled, either as provided by § 35-15-704(c) if the trust is a noncharitable trust, or as provided by § 35-15-704(d) if the trust is a charitable trust. Section 35-15-704(e) shall also apply relative to trust advisors and trust protectors in the same manner as that subsection does to trustees and vacancies in trusteeship.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a trustee shall not be liable for failing to exercise or assume any power or duty held by a trust advisor or trust protector and conferred upon the trustee by subsection (a) for the sixty-day period immediately following the date the trustee obtains knowledge of such vacancy.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section deals with fiduciary vacancies when such fiduciary is serving under a directed trust. It is analogous to T.C.A. § 35-15-704.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-714. Directed trusts; resignation of fiduciary.

A trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, such cotrustee's resignation already being provided for in § 35-15-705, may resign its appointment as such respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under § 35-15-705.

When exercising its powers under this section relative to resignation, the court shall consider the powers, duties and liabilities relative to such respective fiduciaries other than a cotrustee and whether any of such respective fiduciaries are excluded fiduciaries.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section deals with resignation of a fiduciary when such fiduciary is serving under a directed trust. It is analogous to T.C.A. § 35-15-705. It directs a court to consider the respective powers and duties held by a fiduciary, as well as the extent to which such fiduciary is a excluded fiduciary, when exercising its powers relative to resignation.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-715. Directed trusts; removal of fiduciary.

A trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, such cotrustee's removal already being provided for in § 35-15-706, may be removed as such respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under § 35-15-706.

When exercising its powers under this section relative to removal of such respective fiduciary, the court shall consider the powers, duties and liabilities relative to such respective fiduciaries other than a cotrustee and whether any of such respective fiduciaries are excluded fiduciaries.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

“3) The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Section Comment.

This section deals with removal of a fiduciary when such fiduciary is serving under a directed trust. It is analogous to T.C.A. § 35-15-706. It directs a court to consider the respective powers and duties held by a fiduciary, as well as the extent to which such fiduciary is a excluded fiduciary, when exercising its powers relative to removal of any such fiduciary.

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.